Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle A. Voluntary dissolution and liquidation.

§ 81-27-8.001.
Required vote of shareholders or participants.

A state trust company may go into voluntary liquidation and be closed, and may surrender its charter and franchise as a corporation of this state by the affirmative votes of its shareholders or participants owning two-thirds (2/3) of its stock or participation shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.002.
Corporate procedure.

Shareholder or participant action to liquidate a state trust company shall be taken at a meeting of the shareholders or participants duly called by resolution of the board of directors or members, written notice of which, stating the purpose of the meeting, shall be mailed to each shareholder or participant, or in case of a shareholder’s or participant’s death, to such shareholder’s or participant’s legal representative or heirs at law, addressed to the shareholder’s or participant’s last known residence ten (10) days previous to the date of such meeting. If stockholders or participants shall, by the required vote, elect to liquidate a trust company, a certified copy of all proceedings of the meeting at which such action shall have been taken, verified by the oath of the president and secretary, shall be transmitted to the commissioner for approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.003.
Authority to liquidate; publication.

If the commissioner shall approve the liquidation, the commissioner shall issue to the state trust company under the commissioner’s seal, a permit for such purpose. No such permit shall be issued by the commissioner until the commissioner shall be satisfied that provision has been made by the state trust company to satisfy and pay off all creditors. If not so satisfied, the commissioner shall refuse to issue a permit, and shall be authorized to take possession of the state trust company and its assets and business, and hold the same and liquidate the state trust company in the manner provided in this chapter. When the commissioner shall approve the voluntary liquidation of a state trust company, the directors of the state trust company shall cause to be published in a newspaper in the county in which the same is located, or if no newspaper is published in such county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in such county, a notice that the state trust company is closing down its affairs and going into liquidation, and notify its creditors to present their claims for payment. Such notice shall be published once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.004.
Examination and reports.

When any state trust company shall be in process of voluntary liquidation, it shall be subject to examination by the commissioner, and shall furnish such reports from time to time as may be called for by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.005.
Unclaimed property.

All unclaimed property remaining in the hands of a liquidated state trust company shall be subject to the provisions of Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (Section 89-12-1 et seq.).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.006.
Sell or transfer of property.

Whenever the commissioner shall approve it, any state trust company may sell and transfer to any other trust institution, whether state or federally chartered, all of its assets of every kind upon such terms as may be agreed upon and approved by the commissioner and by two-thirds (2/3) vote of its board of directors or members. A certified copy of the minutes of any meeting at which such action is taken, under the oath of the president and secretary, together with a copy of the contract of sale and transfer, shall be filed with the commissioner. Whenever voluntary liquidation shall be approved by the commissioner or the sale and transfer of the assets of any state trust company shall be approved by the commissioner, a certified copy of such approval under seal of the commissioner, filed in the office of the Secretary of State, shall authorize the cancellation of the charter of such state trust company, subject, however, to its continued existence, as provided by this chapter and the general law relative to corporations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.